Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 3
TAXATION AND SERVICE CHARGES

32-11-301. Levy and collection of taxes.

To levy and collect taxes, the board shall determine, in each year, the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the urban district, and shall fix a rate of levy, subject to the provisions of section 32-11-217 (1)(c) and (1)(d), which, when levied upon every dollar of valuation for assessment of taxable property within the district, and, together with other moneys of the district, will raise the amount required by the district annually to supply funds for paying expenses of organization and the costs of acquiring, improving, equipping, operating, and maintaining any project or facilities of the district, and promptly to pay in full, when due, all interest on the principal of, any prior redemption premiums due in connection with, and any other district charges pertaining to the general obligation bonds and other general obligation securities of the district and any other debt of the district, and to meet any other obligations of the district payable from taxes, and in the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies, an additional levy may be made as provided in section 32-11-302.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 757, § 26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-26.

L. 72:

p. 612, § 134.

32-11-302. Levies to cover deficiencies.

The board, in certifying annual levies, shall take into account the maturing obligations for the ensuing year as provided in its contracts, maturing securities, and interest on securities, and deficiencies and defaults in prior years, and shall make ample provision for the payment thereof.

In case the moneys produced from such levies, together with the revenues and any other moneys of the district, are not sufficient punctually to pay the annual installments of its contracts or securities and interest thereon, and to pay defaults and deficiencies, the board shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary for such purposes, and notwithstanding any limitations, except the limitations in section 32-11-217 (1)(d), such taxes shall be made and continue to be levied until the obligations of the district payable from taxes are fully paid.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 757, § 27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-27.

32-11-303. Sinking funds.

Whenever any obligations (other than any special obligations not payable from taxes) have been incurred by the district, subject to the limitations in section 32-11-217 (1)(d), the board may levy taxes and collect revenue for the purpose of creating a reserve in such amount as the board may determine, which may be used to meet such general obligations and any other obligations payable from taxes of the district, for operation and maintenance expenses and depreciation charges, and for defraying the cost of any project of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 758, § 28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-28.

32-11-304. Levying and collecting taxes.

The body having authority to levy taxes within each county in which the district is situate shall levy the taxes provided in section 32-11-217 (1)(c) and (1)(d), and elsewhere in this article.

All officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes shall collect such taxes levied by the district at the time and in the form and manner and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected and, when collected, shall pay the same to the district.

The payment of such collection shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district and paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the district.

All taxes levied under this article, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same, shall constitute, until paid, a perpetual lien on and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be on a parity with the tax lien of other taxes.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 758, § 29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-29.

Cross references:

For collection of taxes, see article 10 of title 39; for enforcement of tax liens, see article 20 of title 39.

32-11-305. Delinquent taxes.

If the taxes levied are not paid, then delinquent real property shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of such taxes, interest, and penalties, in the manner provided by the statutes of the state for selling real property for the nonpayment of taxes. If there are no bids at such tax sale for the property so offered, the property shall be struck off to the county, and the county shall account to the district in the same manner as provided by law for accounting for school, town, and city taxes.

Delinquent personal property shall be distrained and sold as provided by law.

Nothing in this article, neither the tax limitations in section 32-11-217 (1)(d) nor otherwise, shall be construed as preventing the collection in full of the proceeds of all levies of taxes by the district authorized by this article, including without limitation any delinquencies, interest, penalties, and costs.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 758, § 30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-30.

Cross references:

For the sale of tax liens, see article 11 of title 39.

32-11-306. Service charges.

The urban district, as provided in section 32-11-217 (1)(e) and elsewhere in this article, may fix, modify, and collect, or cause to be collected, service charges for direct or indirect connection with, or the use or services of, the facilities of the district, including without limitation minimum charges and charges for the availability of the facilities or services relating thereto.

Such service charges may be charged to and collected in advance or otherwise by the district at any time or from time to time from any person owning real property within the district or from any occupant of such property which directly or indirectly is, has been, or will be connected with the drainage and flood control system of the district or from which or on which originates or has originated rainfall, other surface and subsurface drainage, and storm and flood waters (or any combination thereof) which have entered or may enter such system, and such owner or occupant of any such real property shall be liable for and shall pay such service charges to the district at the time when and place where such service charges are due and payable.

Such service charges of the district may accrue from any date on which the board reasonably estimates, in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any securities or other instrument pertaining thereto or in any contract with any person, that the facilities comprising the system or any project being acquired or improved and equipped will be available for service or use.

Such service charges, as nearly as the district deems practicable and equitable, shall be reasonable, and shall be uniform throughout the district for the same type, class, and amount of use or service of the district's system, and may be based or computed on measurements of drainage flow devices duly provided and maintained by the district or by any user as approved by the district, or on the consumption of water in or on or in connection with the real property, making due allowance for commercial and other use of water discharged into any sanitary sewer system and for any infiltration of groundwater and discharge of surface runoff into such sewer system, or on the capacity of the capital improvements in or on or connected with the real property, or upon the availability of service or readiness to serve by the district's system, or on any other factors determining the type, class, and amount of use or service of the district's system, or on any combination of such factors. The district may give weight to the characteristics of any real property, including without limitation the characteristics of capital improvements, both proposed and existing, in any subdivision or other area in the urban district, and any other special matter affecting the runoff of rainfall, of other surface and subsurface drainage, and of storm and flood waters (or any combination thereof) from such real property directly or indirectly into the district's facilities.

Reasonable penalties may be fixed for any delinquencies, including without limitation interest on delinquent service charges from any date due at a rate of not exceeding one percent per month, or fraction thereof, reasonable attorneys' fees, and other costs of collection.

The district may prescribe and from time to time when necessary revise a schedule of such service charges, which shall comply with the terms of any contract of the district, and in any event shall be such that the revenues from the service charges of the district will at all times be adequate, except to the extent that the proceeds of any taxes or other moneys are available and used, after an allowance is made for delinquencies accrued and reasonably estimated to accrue by the board in the payment of such service charges, whether resulting from any delinquency of any person or from any other cause:

To pay all operation and maintenance expenses;

To pay punctually the principal of and interest on any securities payable from revenues of the district's facilities and issued or to be issued by the district;

To maintain such reserves or sinking funds therefor; and

To pay any expenses incidental to the facilities of the district or any project authorized in this article, any contingencies, acquisitions, improvements, and equipment, and any other cost, as may be required by the terms of any contract of, or as may be deemed necessary or desirable by, the district.

Such schedule shall thus be prescribed and from time to time revised by the district. A public hearing thereon may be, but is not required to be, held by the district at least seven days after such published notice is given, as the district may determine to be reasonable. The district shall fix and determine the time or times when and the place or places where such service charges shall be due and payable and may require that the service charges shall be paid in advance for a period of not more than one year. A copy of such schedule of service charges in effect shall at all times be kept on file at the principal office of the district and shall at all reasonable times be open to public inspection.

The general assembly has determined and hereby declares that the obligations arising from time to time of any person to pay service charges fixed in connection with the district's facilities shall constitute general obligations of the public body or other person charged with their payment; but as such obligations accrue for current services and benefits from and use of such facilities, the obligations shall not constitute an indebtedness of the public body within the meaning of any constitutional, charter, or statutory limitation, or other provision restricting the incurrence of any debt.

No board, agency, bureau, commission, or official other than the board of the district has authority to fix, prescribe, levy, modify, supervise, or regulate the making of service charges, nor to prescribe, supervise, or regulate the performance of services pertaining to the district's facilities, as authorized in this article; but this subsection (6) is not a limitation on the contracting powers of the district acting by and through its board.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 758, § 31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-31.